Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-458
Violations; penalty.

Any person who establishes, operates, or maintains a health care facility or health care service subject to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act without first obtaining a license as required under the act or who violates any of the provisions of the act shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. Each day such facility or service operates after a first conviction shall be considered a subsequent offense.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 58.